Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 36.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-27,166
Submission of certified debt; when effective; Lottery Division of the Department of Revenue; duties.

(1) The Department of Health and Human Services may submit any certified debt of twenty-five dollars or more to the Department of Revenue except when the validity of the debt is legitimately in dispute. The submission of debts of past due support shall be a continuous submission process that allows the amount of past due support to fluctuate up or down depending on the actual amount owed. Any submission shall be effective only to initiate setoff for a claim against a refund that would be made for the calendar year subsequent to the year in which such submission is made.

(2) The Lottery Division of the Department of Revenue shall review all current debts on the records of the Department of Health and Human Services at the time of redeeming a lottery ticket for a state lottery prize to certify a debt owed by a winner of a state lottery prize.

Laws 1984, LB 845, § 12;

Laws 1993, LB 138, § 73;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 803;

Laws 1997, LB 307, § 204;

Laws 2009, LB288, § 36.